District of Columbia statutes.
19-1301.07

Governing law.

The meaning and effect of the terms of a trust are determined by:

(1)

The law of the jurisdiction designated in the terms unless the designation of that jurisdiction’s law is contrary to a strong public policy of the jurisdiction having the most significant relationship to the matter at issue; or

(2)

In the absence of a controlling designation in the terms of the trust, the law of the jurisdiction having the most significant relationship to the matter at issue.

History

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 107 of the Uniform Trust Code.